Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-811
Political subdivisions; certain county officers; names not on ballot; when.

(1)(a) If the names of candidates properly filed for nomination at the primary election for directors of natural resources districts, directors of public power districts, members of airport authority boards elected pursuant to sections 32-547 to 32-549, members of the boards of governors of community college areas, members of the boards of Class I, Class II, Class III, or Class V school districts which nominate candidates at a primary election, and officers of cities of the first or second class and cities having a city manager plan of government do not exceed two candidates for each position to be filled, any such candidates shall be declared nominated and their names shall not appear on any primary election ballots.

(b) If the number of candidates properly filed for the nomination of a political party at the primary election for any county officer elected pursuant to sections 32-517 to 32-529 does not exceed the number of candidates to be nominated by that party for that office, any such properly filed candidates shall be declared nominated and their names shall not appear on any primary election ballots.

(c) The official abstract of votes kept by the county or state shall show the names of such candidates with the statement Nominated Without Opposition. The election commissioner or county clerk shall place the names of such automatically nominated candidates on the general election ballot as provided in section 32-814 or 32-815.

(2) Candidates shall not appear on the ballot in the primary election for the offices listed in subsection (2) of section 32-606.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 232;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 76;

Laws 2003, LB 15, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB449, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB878, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1035, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB56, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 63.